Florida, session 2026, SB386.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âSection 604.40, Florida Statutes, is amended to 25 read: 26 604.40âFarm equipment; protection against defective farm 27 equipment.â 28 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âfarm equipmentâ 29 means all power-drawn, power-driven, or self-propelled equipment 30 used on a farm or used to transport farm products. 31 (2)âNotwithstanding any other law, ordinance, rule, or 32 policy to the contrary, farm equipment all power-drawn, power 33 driven, or self-propelled equipment used on a farm or used to 34 transport farm products may be stored, maintained, or repaired 35 by the owner within the boundaries of the ownerâs farm and at 36 least 50 feet away from any public road without limitation. 37 (2)âThis subsection section does not apply to farm 38 equipment that is used in urban agriculture, as defined in s. 39 604.73(3). 40 (3)(a)âIf farm equipment is defective and does not conform 41 to all applicable express written warranties, the consumer may 42 report the defect to the manufacturer or its authorized service 43 agent during the manufacturerâs warranty period or during the 1 44 year period following the original delivery date of the farm 45 equipment to the consumer to allow the manufacturer or its 46 authorized agent the opportunity to conform the farm equipment 47 to the warranty. Upon receipt of such report, the manufacturer 48 or its authorized agent shall make such repairs as are necessary 49 to conform the equipment to the warranty. Such repairs shall be 50 at no cost to the consumer. 51 (b)âThe manufacturer or its authorized agent shall replace 52 the farm equipment with comparable farm equipment, or accept the 53 return of the defective farm equipment from the consumer and 54 refund the consumer the cash purchase price, including sales 55 tax, license fees, registration fees, and any similar 56 governmental charges if the manufacturer or its authorized 57 dealer is not able to or otherwise fails to conform the farm 58 equipment to any applicable express written warranty after a 59 reasonable number of attempts. 60 (c)âIt is presumed that the manufacturer has made a 61 reasonable number of attempts to conform the farm equipment to 62 the applicable express warranties if the same nonconformity has 63 been the subject of repair three or more times by the 64 manufacturer or its authorized agent but the nonconformity 65 continues to exist. 66 (d)âIn no event shall the presumption provided in paragraph 67 (c) apply to a manufacturer unless the manufacturer or its 68 authorized agent has received prior direct written notification 69 from or on behalf of the consumer and been offered an 70 opportunity to cure the alleged defect. 71 (e)âIt is an affirmative defense to any claim under this 72 chapter that: 73 1.âAn alleged nonconformity does not substantially impair 74 the farm equipmentâs use and market value; or 75 2.âA nonconformity is the result of abuse or neglect, or of 76 modifications or alterations of the farm equipment not 77 authorized by the manufacturer. 78 (f)âThis chapter may not be construed to limit or impair 79 the rights or remedies which are otherwise available to a 80 consumer under chapter 681. 81 (g)âAny consumer who suffers a loss by reason of a 82 violation of this chapter may bring a civil action to enforce 83 such provision. 84 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.